Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.36
Trailer, defined.

Trailer means
semitrailers and trailers as defined in sections 60-348 and 60-354, respectively,
which are required to be licensed as commercial trailers, other vehicles without
motive power constructed so as to permit their being used as conveyances upon
the public streets and highways and so constructed as not to be attached to
real estate and to permit the vehicle to be used for human habitation by one
or more persons, and camping trailers, slide-in campers, fold-down campers,
and fold-down tent trailers.

Machinery and
equipment to which wheels are attached and designed for being towed by a motor
vehicle are excluded from the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 48.